North Carolina, session 2025, HB899.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) Section 30.8 of S.L. 2023-134 is repealed.
SECTION 1.(b) Parts X, XI, and XII of S.L. 2023-151 are repealed.
SECTION 1.(c) Section 6.4 of S.L. 2021-1 is repealed.
SECTION 2.(a) All employees of the Office of the State Fire Marshal on October 1,
2025, shall continue as employees of the Office at their option or until further action is taken by
the Commissioner in accordance with law. All positions in the Office of the State Fire Marshal
on October 1, 2025, shall remain in the Office of the State Fire Marshal unless changed by the
General Assembly.
SECTION 2.(b) Rules adopted by the State Fire Marshal, if any, pursuant to Chapter
58 or Chapter 143 of the General Statutes shall remain in effect until amended by the
Commissioner as authorized by Chapter 150B of the General Statutes.
SECTION 2.(c) A unique fire department identification number (FDID) issued by
the State Fire Marshal, if any, pursuant to G.S. 58-84-41 on or before the date this act becomes
law shall continue to be used for the purposes provided for in G.S. 58-84-41(b).
SECTION 2.(d) The representative trustee appointed by the State Fire Marshal, if
any, pursuant to G.S. 58-84-30 shall continue to serve at the pleasure of the Commissioner.
SECTION 2.(e) The designee appointed by the State Fire Marshal, if any, pursuant
to the Firefighters' and Rescue Squad Workers' Pension Fund Advisory Panel under G.S. 58-86-6
shall continue to serve at the discretion of the Commissioner.
SECTION 2.(f) The current members of the board or commission that were
appointed by the State Fire Marshal may continue to serve until the expiration of their terms.
Upon the expiration of the term of each current member appointed by the State Fire Marshal, the
Commissioner shall appoint a successor in accordance with the provisions of the respective
section of the General Statutes.
SECTION 3. This act is effective October 1, 2025.
*H899-v-1*